Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.060

Administration of chapter—Fees.

This chapter shall be administered under chapter 43.24 RCW. The director shall set registration and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.24.086. If an auctioneer or auction company does not renew a license before it expires, the renewal shall be subject to payment of a penalty fee.

[ 1986 c 324 s 3; 1982 c 205 s 2.]